src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_caallid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - čäälliđ: # MLO, checked
    čäälliđ+V+Inf: čäälliđ
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čálám
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čáláh
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čáálá
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čälleen
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čälivettee
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čäälliv
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čäällip
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: čälivetteđ
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čäälih #corpus: čäälih and čäällih
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čaallim
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: čaallih
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čaalij
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: čaalijm
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: čaalijd
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: čaalijn
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: čaalijm
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čaalijd
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čallii
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: čáláččim
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: čáláččih
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: čáláččij
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: čáláččáim
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: čáláččáid
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: čáláččáin
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: čáláččijm
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: čáláččijd
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: čáláččii
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: čääleem
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: čääleeh
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: čaališ
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: čaližeen
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: čaališvettee
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: čaližává
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: čaližep
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: čaališvetteđ
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: čaližeh
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [čääli, čäle]
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: čáálus
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Du1: čálloon
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Du2: čällee
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Du3: čáállus
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: čáállup
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: čäälliđ
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: čáállus
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [čääli, čäle]
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: čáállám
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: čáláččii
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: čááláá
    čäälliđ+V+PrsPrc: čällee
    čäälliđ+V+PrfPrc: čáállám
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Nom: čäällim
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Ess: čälimin
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Loc: čälimist
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Ill: čälimân
    čäälliđ+V+Ger: čälidijn
    čäälliđ+V+VAbess: čälihánnáá
    
  Verb - jäämmiđ: # generated, to be proofread
    jäämmiđ+V+Inf: jäämmiđ
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jámám
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jámáh
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jáámá
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: jämmeen
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: jämivettee
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: jäämmiv
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: jäämmip
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jämivetteđ
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jäämih  # OBS! jäämmih?
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: jaammim
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: jaammih
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: jaamij
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: jaamijm
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: jaamijd
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: jaamijn
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: jaamijm
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: jaamijd
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: jammii
    jäämmiđ+V+PrfPrc: jáámmám
